 The sound of the airport’s broadcasts loomed between people coming and going, like distant background noise. The brilliance of the stars penetrated softly through the floor to ceiling windows with a unique texture like a movie screen. Compared to the crowds of people, the special passage only occasionally had a few figures walking through it. It looked empty and expensive. At the end of the passage was a space car with a particularly eye-catching six-pointed golden star emblem on it. Sublime Star Abilities College was the only abilties college in the Doya Galaxy. “Student, please show me your report card sequence.” The driver leaned back lazily on the driver’s seat and spoke without raising his head when he heard someone get in the car. The serial number was entered, a beep was heard and the indicator light on the detector turned green. The driver’s closed eyes slightly opened a crack and he happened to see the person passing by. This caused him to be momentarily stunned. The old style of clothing made it immediately obvious that this person was very a remote galaxy. A plain cloak that was rarely seen in the main city was draped over his shoulders, and it hung loosely enough that it covered the entire body. Even though the neckline was high, the half of the face that was exposed was exquisitely beautiful. There was a pair of cat-like apricot coloured eyes that were full of light sleepiness. Set against the unique silver-white curly hair, they were languid and unique. This made people’s eyes linger for a moment and they couldn’t help wanting to touch in an unrestrained manner. The driver had come to the airport today to pick up the college’s freshmen. He had already made several trips, running back and forth because the students came from all over the major galaxies. There were all types of people but this was the first time he saw one that he couldn’t help looking twice at. Yi Jiamu could feel the eyes on him. It wasn’t only from the driver but also from the other people in the space car. He slowly looked around in silence. Then he walked to a corner of the last row with his backpack in his arms, found a comfortable posture and closed his eyes. This was the first time that Yi Jiamu had been so far away from his home town star. Perhaps it was because he had been on a light ship for too long but he seemed a bit airsick. This cloak was very useful. It might be a bit oversized for him but he could pull it up and wrap it around him to be used as a quilt. New students arrived one after another. After it became full of people, the space car started to depart for the Sublime Star Campus. By the time Yi Jiamu woke up again, he had just arrived at the entrance of the school. He had gained a lot of energy after sleeping and looked around curiously once he got out of the car. He heard his grandfather tell him that the outside was very different from their tower star. Now it seemed to be true. Even the shape of the houses was strange. Yi Jiamu stood in an open square for a long time. Um, so, what should he do next? He was just frowning and thinking when the communicator in his backpack rang. He glanced at the caller name and clicked to connect. “Uncle Wu, um...; I’ve arrived. Okay, should I go now?” Wu Qingji’s calm and steady voice came from the phone. Perhaps it was because the other person was Yi Jiamu but his tone was also filled with a faint indulgence. “Enter the gate and walk straight to the end. Turn 50 metres to the left from the fountain and you will find the School of Theory. I’ve already arranged your information there. The ability option doesn’t need to be filled in, do you know?” “I know.” Yi Jiamu responded, obviously not too concerned about the arrangement. Then after a while, he spoke slowly. “Still, is this really okay? Won’t it be very troublesome if it is exposed by someone?” Wu Qingji was slightly choked up and coughed twice. “80% of the students of the School of Theory are those with no abilities. The rest all have passive type abilities like you. It is usually difficult to distinguish them so it won’t have any effect.” He said this and then laughed softly. “Your ability is special. If you want to be chased by the various school departments every dayk2026;” “I know.” This time, Yi Jiamu simply agreed. “I will go to enrol now.” On the other end of the communicator, Wu Qingji couldn’t help laughing loudly. Unfortunately, he didn’t come with this person or he would really want to rub this cute little guy’s head. “There are many things to do at the start of the school year. I will come find you when I’m less busy.” Yi Jiamu responded positively and hung up. Then he looked at the surrounding environment. He found the School of Theory according to the directions that Wu Qingji gave him. The teacher at the registration office glanced at the form he submitted and looked up at him. “You are the student with the Ability Deficiency Disorder that Professor Wu mentioned?” “Ah? Uh, yes.” The teacher gazed at him with eyes that were filled with a faint maternal love. “Don’t worry too much. Sublime Star might be known as the ‘cradle of ability masters but the teaching staff of the School of Theory are also very powerful. Even if you can’t become an abilities master in the future, you will be able to take part in relevant work after graduation. Regardless of whether it is the military department or the scientific department, it is a good choice.” In the face of this over-caring gaze, Yi Jiamu gently scratched the side of his face. “Yes, thank you Teacher.” The teacher smiled and filed the information. Then seeing that he was about to leave, the teacher suddenly asked, “Little student, do you have an alpha?” Yi Jiamu’s footsteps paused. “Eh?” Before he could reply, a card was stuffed into his hand. “I have a nephew who happens to be a senior of the School of Theory. If you need help in the future then ask him at any time.” Yi Jiamu, “...;...;” He stepped away from the freshman registration desk and lowered his head to look at the small information card in his hand. His grandfather was right. The elders outside really liked him. *** After completing the enrollment registration, he should’ve gone to this dormitory. However, Yi Jiamu had slept in the school car and was temporarily quite spirited. In a rare moment, he decided to go and look around. Sublime Star Abilities College was one of the seven major ability schools in the United Nations. It was more like a city with complete facilities than a school and it was even more prosperous than his remote home town tower star. Even so, this high degree of civilization had its disadvantages. For example, previously if Yi Jiamu dozed off, he could nap anywhere using his cloak. However, here, as soon as he was ready to find a place to lie down, several mechanical arms would emerge to lift him from the ground. If he hadn’t run quickly then he might’ve been thrown into the recycling bin as garbage. Yi Jiamu was tired and couldn’t find a place to sleep. He gained a brief understanding of the structure of the campus and was prepared to go to this dormitory. Just as he yawned and passed the first corner, his attention was attracted by a situation not far away. There was a building with a simple structure. It was probably a warehouse but for some unknown reason, it was surrounded by people. They all seemed to be students of the school. He walked over to inquire before realizing that some senior students had set up a game here. It cost 100 star coins per person. If someone walked through this door and could persist for five minutes then they could get 10 times the profit. Yi Jiamu was originally a bit drowsy. Then he heard that he could make a net profit of 900 star coins and he immediately became energetic. “Only five minutes is enough?” There were two senior students next to him. Hearing this, they couldn’t help laughing. “Only five minutes? This little school brother is someone who just came this year right? Let me tell you something as a senior. The things that happen in Sublime Star aren’t as simple as you think.” Yi Jiamu was puzzled. “Isn’t it written in the rules that there is no fighting? Is there a hidden trick?” One senior student saw his harmless appearance and shook his head sadly. “It can’t be called a hidden trick. Sometimes there are things that are so scary that you can’t imagine it.” Yi Jiamu thought about it before deciding he couldn’t understand. Just then, the warehouse door opened and a trembling figure was thrown into a corner. He curled up and shivered, unable to stand up for a long time. He was obviously a freshman who had just arrived on his clothes today. His clothes were clean, tidy and he didn’t look like he had been poisoned. However, his face was pale, sweat covered his forehead and it took a long time for his empty eyes to gradually recover. He looked like he had just returned from a journey to hell and experienced despair from beginning to end. The people in the area started talking. “What’s going on?” “Oh, you must be new if you can ask this question.” “I’m a bit curious about what’s inside.” “Little children, this senior will give you some advice. Have you heard of curiosity kills the cat?” “Speaking of which, it’s been so long. No one has managed to come out standing?” “With all due respect, they are already a brave person if they manage to come out lying down.” Yi Jiamu’s eyes swept over the new student who lost his mind and was thoughtful. Listening to them, it didn’t seem easy to win this money. He frowned for a moment but under the temptation of 900 star coins, he still took a step forward. The senior student next to him noticed his movements and grabbed his hand. “Little student, do you really want to go?” “Yes, I still want to see it.” The senior had a complicated expression. It stood to reason that he shouldn’t be nosy but this omega new student was too beautiful. Although the name of the man inside couldn’t be casually mentioned, he still couldn’t help trying to persuade this student. “Sublime Star has this type of game that offers the newcomers as a sacrifice every year. It isn’t that easy to earn the money.” Yi Jiamu’s apricot eyes looked at him for a moment. “It turns out to be like this. I understand.” The senior student thought he finally listened and was relieved. Then he saw Yi Jiamu crouching down and searching through his backpack. After a moment, the took something else and placed it seriously in the senior’s hand. “Senior, I don’t know what will happen. I have to temporarily trouble you to look after my Cici for a while.” (Ci=thorn/sting/pierce etc) Making money was important but it sounded dangerous. Yi Jianmu was worried that something would happen to Cici. The senior student stared at the object in his hand and couldn’t react for a while. Wasn’t this just a small cactus that hadn’t grown? Cici, this thing actually had a name?! He subconsciously raised his arms. By the time his mind finally returned and he wanted to say a few words, the omega student was no longer in front of him. His companion next to him patted him lightly on the shoulder and pointed to the dark doorway of the warehouse. “Don’t look for him. He has already entered.” “...;...;” The senior student silently glanced at this ‘Cici’ in the pot and inexplicably had the feeling of seeing a relic. Little school brother, please come out alive! The entire warehouse looked very old. In the darkness, light that leaked through several narrow windows became the only light source. Irregular outlines of piled out debris could faintly be seen. Yi Jiamu’s apricot-coloured eyes narrowed slightly and he soon became familiar with such a dim environment. The moment he entered, he could feel gazes from the surroundings. They were gazes full of playfulness and it was obvious there were many people. He didn’t know who but someone whistled softly after seeing his appearance. Yi Jiamu looked around him and finally fell in front of him. There was a man sitting on top of a tall pile of debris. From Yi Jiamu’s point of view, there was exactly one foot in his field of vision. The black boots were made of good leather but it wasn’t easy to climb so high. They were inevitably contaminated with a lot of dust. The draped coat hung down and the clothing swayed in the wind without rhythm. The man’s upper body was completely shrouded in darkness. Even if Yi Jiamu’s eyesight was good, he could only see a faint outline. The other side looked at him quietly. Then in a place that couldn’t be seen, he suddenly laughed softly. “It seems that this year’s game is quite popular.” Just listening to the tone was enough to imagine that this person’s mood was quite pleasant. Soon, the others also laughed. Yi Jiamu stood in a place and didn’t move, but there were slight emotions on his face. Were they actually so happy to hold an event to support new students like him? It turned out that the people outside were so kind and benevolent? The other people saw the way he didn’t speak and to them, he seemed to have a sense of helplessness. In addition, this omega who was harmless to humans and animals gave off a cute air, making the tall man who came forward look at him more. The tall man was a bit impatient but this time, his tone was rarely gentle. “Little school brother, are you ready?” “Yes, I’m ready.” Yi Jiamu nodded and searched through his bag for a long time before finding a star coin with a value of 100 and handing it to the other side. “I have to trouble Senior!” There was a serious expression on his face through the entire process, like it was a very sacred ritual. The tall man, “...;...;” There was no need to be so solemn. He threw the star coin into his bag. It collided with the other coins in his bag and there was a clear sound. Then he looked up at the man sitting on the highest point and declared calmly, “Then the time will begin.” It instantly became silent and the vaguely whispered words became quiet. Yi Jiamu didn’t know what would happen next. He held the backpack in front of him tightly and watched the movements around him with a wary face. The tall man’s name was Xu Yi. Today, he had nothing to do and came to join in on the fun. At this time, he leaned against the wall with his arms crossed. He was interested to see if this beautiful junior could last for a few seconds. As a result, one minute passed and the warehouse was still in a peaceful and harmonious state. There was a trace of consternation in Xu Yi’s eyes and he couldn’t help looking up at the man in the darkness. What was going on? Wasn’t he ready to do it? The omega student might indeed look good but according to his knowledge of his friend, this wasn’t a person whose heart was easily moved. Just then, the man sitting up high stood up. Yi Jiamu was vigilant and looked up at the sound. He saw the man slip gently from the pile of debris and come toward him step to step. The dust floated in the faint sunlight and the man finally stopped in front of him. Yi Jiamu subconsciously looked up and finally saw the other person’s appearance. Tidy black hair that showed a light gray luster in the dim light, long and narrow ice blue eyes with a charming tear mole and an obsidian earring hanging from his ear. Against the excessively white skin, he exuded a type of shocking morbid beauty. This person was clearly an alpha but Yi Jiamu felt he was more beautiful than all the omegas Yi Jiamu had seen. He couldn’t help taking another look. A person outside actually looked so good. Seeing this new student stare into Gu Yesheng’s eyes for a moment, the people nearby were no longer smiling mischievously and instead sucked in a cold breath. According to their previous perceptions, this could be classified as a sign that they didn’t die fast enough. However, Gu Yesheng was thinking about something and didn’t pay much attention to them at this time. He stared into the apricot coloured eyes and his eyebrows twisted slightly. A moment later, he sincerely asked, “You aren’t afraid of me?” Even his voice was like a round jade hooking into the souls of a person, charming and unique. Yi Jiamu blinked blankly. “Should I be afraid of you?” Gu Yesheng thought about it before smiling. “It’s true.” Xu Yi couldn’t help straightening at the conversation between the two people, his eyes full of consternation. He was obviously very puzzled by this development. He knew exactly what Gu Yesheng’s ability was. Today, he said that he would tease the new students but he didn’t do anything to this little school brother. What type of fairy plot was this? Seeing the two people still looking at each other, Xu Yi couldn’t help reminding them. “There is only one minute left.” As the challenger, Yi Jiamu was naturally very happy to hear the time was coming. He couldn’t help thinking about how to spend the newly earned 900 star coins. On the other hand, his past experience taught him that the closer to the end, the more cautious he needed to be. Thus, his already vigilant nerves tightened. Just then, the man in front of him suddenly reached out a hand and gently raised his chin. Yi Jiamu should’ve flashed away but the other side’s inquiring expression didn’t seem malicious. Therefore, he let this person act while feeling puzzled and suspicious. Such a hand was delicate and white, with a sudden coolness on the fingertips. It slid over his face like a snake without temperature, slowly moving up the side of his face. Yi Jiamu probably understood these tentative actions. He saw the other person’s thoughtful expression and blinked innocently. Obviously, the beautiful alpha in front of him should be a mental ability player. It was no wonder why the rules stated that no fighting would occur. People who could awaken such abilities were rare but their effectiveness in actual combat was exceptionally strong. Ordinary students basically had no way to deal with it. It was just a pity that this ability had no effect on Yi Jiamu. There was silence all around them like no one else was here. Who would’ve thought that Gu Yesheng, who always disliked people approaching him, would actually touch someone like this in public?! Xu Yi was also a bit stunned. He inadvertently glanced at the number and remembered. “Time is up.” Gu Yesheng heard his words and quietly pulled his hand back, a rather playful smile suddenly showing on his face. “Congratulations little school brother, you’ve succeeded.” This smile succeeded in making the others feel that their backs were cold. Xu Yi came over, pulled out coins from his pocket and placed them in Yi Jiamu’s hand. “Here is your reward, take it.” “Thank you, Senior.” Yi Jiamu counted the pieces in his hand one by one and finally nodded. “The number is correct.” Xu Yi, “...;...;” 900 star coins, did they seem like people who would be lacking this type of money? Yi Jiamu politely said goodbye to them. He didn’t even ask their names and happily left. He wanted to pick up his Cici outside. Xu Yi looked at the back that disappeared out the door and turned to look. He saw Gu Yesheng leaning on the back of a chair, half his face covered by his slender fingers and it was unknown what he was thinking. Almost all the students in the school were afraid of Gu Yesheng. Xu Yi was one of the few people who could communicate with him normally. At this time, other people were silent. Only Xu Yi walked past indifferent and asked in a voice that only the two of them could hear, “What’s wrong with you? Do you like that omega?” Gu Yesheng glanced at him through the gap in his fingers and the corner of his mouth curved in an inexplicable arc. “Do you think so?” Xu Yi was just casually ridiculing him. Seeing Gu Yesheng’s attitude, he couldn’t help choking up. “You really like him?” Gu Yesheng seemed to be thinking of something and didn’t speak for a while. After a long time, he lowered his hands and looked down, his fingertips still containing the faint sensation left by that person. Suddenly, he inexplicably smiled. “This little omega school brother is really very interesting...;” *** The Blues Cafe on the West Campus was a place where Sublime Star students liked to gather. Gu Xiucheng gently extinguished the cigarette butt in his hand and gently breathed out a curl of smoke, the playful style forming a sharp contrast with his appearance of a good student. There was a touch of contempt in his indifferent voice. “Gu Yesheng went to bully the freshmen again? Sure enough, it is his style. He is relying on the identity of our family to play the domineering role in school.” Then he sneered. “Still, as someone with no mother or father, I want to see how long he can be arrogant.” Even among the many ability families, the Gu family was quite important. Like many ancient families in the field, faction battles had always existed. Gu Xiucheng and Gu Yesheng might be cousins but Gu Xiucheng was very ambitious. Gu Yesheng might be the future leader of the Gu family but Gu Xiucheng never hid his feelings and the two of them were in conflict. The feud between them wasn’t a secret in Sublime Star. The students who came to relay the information stood there respectfully with straight backs. They couldn’t help shaking uncontrollably at such emotionless words. “Speaking of which, he plays this game every year and still isn’t bored.” Gu Xiucheng sneered. He saw that the people in front of him didn’t mean to leave and his eyes narrowed slightly. “What? Do you have something else to say?” One of the students hesitated before saying, “Today...; someone came out of the warehouse unscathed.” Gu Xiucheng’s hand that was grabbing his coffee paused. “Who?” Under his gaze, the student’s voice couldn’t help getting lower. “An omega freshman. The rest...; I’m not quite sure about.” Gu Xiucheng’s fingers rubbed thoughtfully against the cup handle. “Go and check.” The author has something to say: Touching progress get√ Yi Jiamu walked into his dormitory with his backpack and saw his new roommate unpacking. The person heard him, looked up and greeted him enthusiastically. “Hello, my name is Sang Bei. Please take care of me in the future!” Sublime Star’s dormitory consisted of double rooms. Sang Bei was an omega like him and was a freshman of the School of Theory with no ability. Yi Jiamu introduced himself briefly and slowly took off the diamond-shaped necklace from around his neck. It had long passed the age where people needed to drag luggage around. The small crystal on his necklace was actually a storage space with a huge capacity. Several boxes were taken out in a short amount of time. Sang Bei looked on a bit enviously. “The space in your necklace is really big and it looks good. Where did you buy it?” Yi Jiamu carefully folded his clothes. He heard this question and didn’t raise his head. “I don’t know, my brother gave it to me.” He had an older brother. Unfortunately, his brother was so busy that he couldn’t remember how long it had been since he saw his brother. Yet strangely, Yi Jiamu missed him. Yi Jiamu looked very leisurely while putting away his things. He carefully stacked one piece of clothing in a neat and tidy way before slowly starting the next one. His skin was white and clean. The stellar luster fell through the window frame and added a layer of light. Combined with the silver-white hair, he looked like an elaborately carved porcelain doll, lazy and unique. For the first time, Sang Bei looked at an omega and was a bit dazed. After standing there for a moment, he remembered. “I’ll help you clean up!” Yi Jiamu wanted to say ‘no need’ but before he could, the figure next to him was already moving with great efficiency. His apricot coloured eyes blinked and he formed his first evaluation of his roommate: extremely enthusiastic. Sang Bei helped him clean up and casually asked, “Did you also enter Sublime Star through the examination?” “Yes, my family let me come so I came.” “Indeed.” Sang Bei nodded. “In the current state of the United Nations, being engaged in ability-related industries is indeed more popular than other fields. However, Sublime Star’s School of Theory isn’t easy to test into. Millions of people crowded into one place to do the test yet you actually entered through the test. You’re amazing!” Yi Jiamu spoke politely according to this logic. “Then you’re also amazing.” “I’m not that great. I’ve been preparing for this year’s admissions exam for several years.” Sang Bei couldn’t help feeling sentimental. “I’ve always admired ability users since I was a child. I dreamed about becoming a member of the Abilities Association. However, I didn’t awaken an ability so I can only come to this School of Theory to have fun.” Then his tone became happy again. “Fortunately, my efforts weren’t bad and I ended up passing the taste! If I don’t have an ability then I don’t have an ability. It is still very satisfying to work in the field of abilities after graduation!” Hearing this, Yi Jiamu gave a cooperative hum. At the same time, he added a new evaluation in his heart: extremely enthusiastic with words. The two people unpacked and the efficiency was much faster. In the blink of an eye, all the things brought by Yi Jiamu were organized. These things were stuffed in by his grandfather before leaving the house. At the time, Yi Jiamu just placed it in his storage space without looking. Now that he cleaned up, he found that all his daily necessities were present and it was amazingly complete. Sang Bei was about to move back when he saw Yi Jiamu bend down to open his backpack. In fact, Sang Bei had noticed it from the moment this person entered the door. Yi Jiamu had such a high-end storage space yet he was carrying this bag. It was unknown what treasures were hidden inside. Sang Bei couldn’t help feeling curious. Then he saw Yi Jiamu pull out a pot from it. Sang Bei couldn’t help choking up. “This is...; a cactus?” Yi Jiamu carefully placed the pot on the window and turned back with a smile. “Yes, it is called Cici.” He stared at Sang Bei brightly. There seemed to be faint expectations in the light apricot coloured eyes. Sang Bei hesitated for a moment before smiling and waving to the little green thing. “Hello, please give me a lot of advice in the future Cici.” *** On the first day of Sublime Star Abilities College, the main thing was to report in and enroll. The freshmen would only formally gather the next day. Yi Jiamu and Sang Bei were classmates. After receiving the notice, they went to their designated classroom for the first class meeting. The freshmen class meeting actually had no real content. It was basically to let the students get to know each other before symbolically choosing a few people for the class committee. Then it was over. Yi Jiamu wasn’t interested in the entire process and sat there in a daze. He managed to make it to the end before standing up sleepily, “I will go to OG.” OG was a milk tea store on the other side of the West Campus. Yesterday, Sang Bei had taken him to buy a drink after dinner and he had directly become addicted. Sang Bei was too lazy to move around and wasn’t polite when he heard these words. “I’ve gone there all the time. Can I trouble you to bring me a cup! Oolong milk tea, love you!” Yi Jiamu’s attitude to doing things was always casual and there was no reason to refuse this easy matter. He slowly walked to OG, bought the milk tea and slowly walked back. He was usually a bit lazy and sometimes needed to force himself to move properly by setting a goal in this way. It was said that if you didn’t move for too long, you would become fat. He thought about it while walking at the same frequency. Just then, his communicator rang. He looked down and saw ‘Wu Qingji’. He remembered that the other person said he would come visit once his busy schedule was over. Yi Jiamu was preparing to check the message and didn’t notice a person suddenly appearing in front of him. He directly ran into this person. Papers were scattered all over the place. Yi Jiamu held the two cups of milk tea steadily in his hand and opened his mouth. “Ah, I’m sorry.” The effect of force was mutual. It was unclear who had bumped into who but apologizing in advance could often avoid a lot of unnecessary trouble. He was afraid of trouble. This person’s temper seemed very good and he only said “It’s fine,” to Yi Jiamu’s apology. However, he was a bit distressed looking at the documents all over the place and he asked Yi Jiamu, “Excuse me, little school brother. There are too many documents. Can you help me deliver them to Building G?” Yi Jiamu was very casual. “Okay.” Not far away, two people stood in the corridor of the third floor of the teaching building and saw such a scene. Xu Yi glanced at Gu Yesheng next to him and smiled. “Yo, isn’t this the little school brother you showed pity to yesterday?” Gu Yesheng’s eyes narrowed slightly and his tone was a bit sarcastic. “Why is it that your words can never be separated from love matters?” As he spoke, his eyes fell on the slender figure. His eyesight was quite good. Even at this distance, he could see the delicate side face with some sleepiness. He looked well-behaved carrying the large stack of documents. Perhaps it was because Gu Yesheng’s interest was successfully aroused yesterday. He clearly hated such good students on ordinary days but at this time, he couldn’t help looking a bit more. Xu Yi whistled. “I want to give you a reminder but since he isn’t your love partner, forget it.” This tone was clearly to awaken Gu Yesheng’s curiosity. Gu Yesheng had always been too lazy to care about this person but at this time, he vaguely felt there was something. He leaned lazily against the railing and made a morbid smile. “If you want to improve the wound healing ability of your mind, I can do my best to lay a foundation for you.” “No, I don’t want to try it. you can keep your ability to yourself.” Xu Yi was very sad about this bad behaviour of threatening a friend. He pointed to the figure that had gone far away. “Don’t you remember this person? Jiang Hean of the School of Elements. He is usually very close with Gu Xiucheng.” Once Gu Xiucheng’s name was heard, the surrounding air pressure was much lower. Xu Yi glanced at Gu Yesheng’s expression and the tone of his voice elongated a bit with interest. “Tell me, this child is being targeted. Is it really just a coincidence?” *** Yi Jiamu followed, occasionally looking at the milk tea in the bag hanging from his fingertips in a distracted manner. It wasn’t until he was taken to an empty classroom that he looked around. “Senior, did we go to the wrong place?” Jiang Hean smiled kindly. “It isn’t the wrong place. Little school brother, you’ve worked hard. Just place it on the table.” Yi Jiamu put down the documents. “Then I’m going.” Just then, he heard the door behind him suddenly close. Yi Jiamu finally realized that the atmosphere wasn’t quite right. Looking back now, it seemed he was brought here deliberately. He looked up at the person in front of him in a puzzled manner. “Senior, how have I offended you?” The light coloured eyes were very clear and he looked even more harmless. This obviously wasn’t the reaction a student should have to being suddenly threatened. Jiang Hean was slightly stunned by this gaze. It took him a while to recover and he made his tone harder. “Offended? Don’t you know? I would advise you to confess. What is the relationship between you and Gu Yesheng?” Yi Jiamu was even more confused. “Who is Gu Yesheng?” “Are you still pretending to be stupid?” Jiang Hean’s face grew cold and fire started to appear in the palm of his right hand as he walked toward Yi Jiamu step by step. “Gu Yesheng isn’t a person who would be merciful to freshmen. If he didn’t know you then how could he easily let you out of the warehouse? I advise you to be honest. Otherwise, it would be a pity if such a pretty little face was damaged.” Yi Jiamu watched this person approach. There still wasn’t much expression on his face. This crimson flame belonged to the fire type and it was also the lowest grade. Nevertheless, he understood one thing. Gu Yesheng was the one who touched him in the warehouse yesterday, the alpha with a particularly evil appearance. Jiang Hean saw that he didn’t respond and thought he was scared stupid. Jiang Hean played with the fire in his hand and threw it at him with a sneer. Unexpectedly, there wasn’t a scream. There was only a bang as the closed door was kicked open from the outside. Gu Yesheng walked into the classroom, saw Jiang Hean’s arrogant demeanor and smiled happily. “Yo, I found you.” Jiang Hean clearly wasn’t happy. His face turned white the moment he saw the visitor and his entire body started shaking. Gu Yesheng saw this person look like he had seen a ghost and couldn’t help laughing. “I haven’t even started and you’re already like this.” Jiang Hean suddenly reacted. He turned and ran. Before he could take even two steps, it was as if he was shrouded in an extreme fear. He held his head tightly and curled up on the ground. A black cloth covered his eyes without warning. Indistinctly, the figure of a spider emerged in his mind little by little. A sticky liquid flowed from its side and the dark single eye stared at him in the darkness. Then the greasy fangs slowly opened to reveal blood red poison glands. Jiang Hean called out, “Don’t come here...; stay back! Don’t! Ah—!” Hoarse screams filled the air. Gu Yesheng’s ice blood eyes seemed a bit deep. The tear mole at the corner of his eye was morbid yet charming. He was obviously enjoying this extremely twisted appearance. “Gu Xiucheng’s dog, haven’t you learned to raise your tail yet? Are you a human?” Jiang Hean obviously couldn’t hear the words anymore. The cold sweat on his pale face wouldn’t stop and his hands seemed to be looking for something invisible. In his despair, he could only let his nails desperately dig into the palm of his hands, causing a bloody mess. He was nearly suffocated by this fear that dominated him only to feel the sense of oppression around his body relax. The hellish images in his mind started to disperse one by one. Yet even if he felt the light around him again, he had just experienced an endless abyss. He still firmly remembered the bone-chilling despair. Jiang Hean curled up on the ground for a long time, shaking. He didn’t even have the strength to stand up. Gu Yesheng watched him for a while before feeling a bit tired. He was too lazy to bother making a deal and turned to look in Yi Jiamu’s direction. The scene that entered his eyes was a figure crouching down sullenly. Gu Yesheng thought he was frightened. After all, this kid was involved because of him. In a rare manner, his conscience was pricked and he prepared a few words of comfort. Then he approached and realized it wasn’t what he thought. Yi Jiamu might be crouching there but his bright eyes didn’t look frightened at all. Rather, he was frowning and was obviously unhappy. Gu Yesheng was intrigued and walked over to crouch down next to this person. He asked humbly, “Why are you crouching down here?” Yi Jiamu looked up and showed the bag that had a hole burned through it. His expression was dull and his voice was a bit aggrieved. “My milk tea was spilled.” One cup was 10 star coins. It was very expensive. He was silent for a moment before reaching out to grab Gu Yesheng’s sleeve. “Compensate me.” The author has something to say: Gu Yesheng: ??? Touching porcelain? For the students of the Sublime Star Abilities College, there were two names that everyone knew. One was Lu Zexiu and the other was Gu Yesheng. Lu Zexiu was the president of the university’s highest student abilities organization, the holder of an S-grade ability certificate, the youngest member of the Galaxy Society of Abilities and the best existence in the eyes of all the teachers and students. No one could resist this flawless perfection and he was undoubtedly the highest student representative of Sublime Star. Gu Yesheng was completely different from Lu Zexiu. Everyone remembered his name to remind themselves that they should stay away from this person at all times. His unpredictable temperament combined with his absolutely frightening ability meant his existence was like a bomb. No one knew when he would suddenly explode. They still remembered that a year ago, there was a society that made Gu Yesheng unhappy. Finally, everyone was sent to the Galaxy Hospital for psychological treatment. There were still people who were in a state of madness and hadn’t come out after entering the psychiatry department. Even though anyone with a bit of knowledge of the situation knew there was a reason for it happening, Gu Yesheng’s unique ability was enough to make everyone fear him. Obviously, this didn’t include Yi Jiamu who didn’t know him at all. Gu Yesheng hadn’t heard someone talk to him like this and try to touch porcelain. He inexplicably felt it was interesting and asked with a smile, “Child, I just saved you yet you want me to compensate you?” “Isn’t it because of you that I was targeted by him?” In addition, he had already dodged. It was because this man suddenly kicked open the door and Yi Jiamu was dazed for a moment that the fire burned the bag with the milk tea. Simply put, he was pitted twice. He didn’t think there was anything wrong with asking for compensation. Gu Yesheng crouched beside him and this height allowed them both to look at each other. He heard the question and didn’t have a guilty conscience. Instead, he looked disapproving. “Even so, I still saved you.” He didn’t know why but seeing this harmless appearance, he was in a teasing mood. At this time, the expression on Yi Jiamu’s face was a bit unhappy. Eventually, he didn’t say anything and just stood up sullenly. “If you can’t afford it then forget it.” Gu Yesheng saw he was ready to leave like this and reached out to hold him. “Who said I can’t afford it?” Yi Jiamu looked at him silently with an expression that said ‘you clearly know the person who said it in your heart.’ Gu Yesheng was silent for a moment under this gaze, the smile on his face disappearing slowly. Then he walked up to this little student and looked down at him, speaking quietly, “Yes, I’ll compensate you. How many cups do you want?” A sincere smile instantly appeared on Yi Jiamu’s expressionless face. “Two cups, thank you. You’re a good person.” His smile made his facial features appear extraordinarily soft. His eyes were crystal clear and sincerity shone from inside him. This expression entered Gu Yesheng’s eyes and made him fall into a trance. He didn’t know why but there was an inexplicable illusion. Regardless of Jiang Hean who was still on the ground, the two people walked out the door and back to the milk tea store. There was a long line in front but everyone froze when they saw Gu Yesheng and gave way. Gu Yesheng walked slowly to the window. He was just preparing to order when he found he had never tried this thing before. He turned back to Yi Jiamu. “What flavour do you want?” “Oolong milk tea and caramel milk tea with ice cream. Both of them should have the third level of sugar.” Gu Yesheng repeated it to the employee, took the bill and waited for the order. Neither of them felt there was any problem with this type of interaction. However, the students who distanced themselves were secretly shaking. What was happening? Did this ancestor suddenly want to fall in love? Someone glanced at Yi Jiamu. He felt excessive shock and couldn’t help risking his life to secretly take two photos with his terminal. Thus, a hidden gossip group of Sublime Star Abilities College was completely turned upside down. [Shocking news! Shocking news! The school bully seems to have an omega!] [Oh my god, isn’t this fake? Which cute little OO is so unlucky?] [You haven’t seen it. The school bully personally brought this person to buy milk tea. He spoiled this person!] [Slow down...; spoiled? Are you sure the school bully you’re talking about is the same school bully I know?] [I am asking for a photo of this omega. Let me see what type of peerless beauty this O is!] [Photo.jpg.] [Fuck fuck, this omega is a bit cute! Are there any other photos?] [Sisters, don’t you know that these two photos were taken at the risk of falling to the ground?] [Oh? I always thought that the school bully would be with the president. Isn’t an AA love sweet?] ...;...; [You still dare to gossip about Gu Yesheng? It turns out that after a holiday, all of you are tired of living.] [Yes, it is a matter of life. Here is the dividing line to end the topic——] Yi Jiamu was satisfied as he received two cups of hot milk tea. He opened a straw and inserted it. He looked up to see Gu Yesheng, the gold master standing beside him empty handed. He casually wondered, “Didn’t you buy yourself a cup?” Gu Yesheng’s lips curved up. “I don’t drink this type of thing.” “Oh.” Yi Jiamu didn’t say anything else. He just drank with a satisfied and happy expression. Gu Yesheng saw that this person was ignoring him and smelled the milk tea that filled the air. “Is it so delicious?” Yi Jiamu nodded. “Yes, it was my first time drinking it yesterday and it’s very good. If you want to drink then you can still buy a cup to try it.” “There is already one ready-made. What should I buy?” Gu Yesheng reached out and grabbed the milk tea in Yi Jiamu’s hand. He raised it to his mouth and took a sip. The strong caramel flavour accompanied by the milk flavour swept through his mouth. Um, it didn’t seem as bad as expected. Yi Jiamu’s hand was empty and he couldn’t help frowning as he reminded, “This cup is mine.” Gu Yesheng corrected him. “I bought it for you.” Yi Jiamu once again corrected it. “It is compensation.” Gu Yesheng smiled at him and didn’t speak. He took a large sip and saw that the milk tea had visibly decreased by a large amount. Then he placed it back into Yi Jiamu’s hand. Even the tear drop mole at the corner of his eye looked arrogant. He thought he could see an angry expression. As a result, Yi Jiamu directly placed the milk tea back into Gu Yesheng’s hand. His tone was quite disgusted. “You take it. Next time, pay for a new cup.” Gu Yesheng raised his eyebrows. “You drank a lot before me.” “As long as there is less than half, it isn’t a cup. You have agreed on the compensation. It isn’t right to be cheap and take advantage of me, Senior.” It was quite right. If someone else talked to him like this, Gu Yesheng would’ve kicked them a long time ago. However, today his temper was surprisingly good. He narrowed his eyes with the straw in his mouth. “Okay, child. What’s your name? I’ll buy it for you next time.” “Yi Jiamu. I’m a freshman of the School of Theory.” *** Yi Jiamu returned to his dormitory where Sang Bei was lying on the bed and playing games. He didn’t raise his head when he heard the door open. “You finally came back. I thought you got lost in school and was ready to call a guard if you didn’t come back.” Yi Jiamu placed the milk tea on his table. “Is something wrong?” Sang Bei saw his crystal explode in the game and covered his chest to suppress his heartache. Then he turned over to look at Yi Jiamu. “Didn’t you see the class group chat?” It was only now that Yi Jiamu took out his communicator and saw that it had exploded with messages. The number 999+ messages made him too lazy to read through it all. He directly asked, “What happened?” Sang Bei shook his head at this person’s disregard of what was happening outside and explained patiently, “You know how some of our courses have a two class system? There will be a combined physical education class tomorrow afternoon. The system has placed us with a class from the School of Combat.” Yi Jiamu heard this and was more confused. “So?” “You really don’t know anything!” Sang Bei was helpless about this roommate and couldn’t help feeling anger as he remembered this matter. “Originally, the class combinations are produced randomly every semester. However, the people of the School of Combat are dissatisfied with this arrangement and went directly to the Academic Affairs Office. They were finally refused but it is clear that they are looking down on the students of the School of Theory! So what if we don’t have abilities? Is it so amazing? The class committee has held a meeting just now. This time, the entire class is required to unite. Tomorrow, we must let those students of the School of Combat take a good look! We must not lose the reputation of our School of Theory!” Yi Jiamu heard up to here and finally understood. Physical fitness classes were very similar to physical education classes in ordinary schools. In this class, the School of Combat students had physical strengthening abilities and were like decathlon sports students. The students of the School of Theory were obviously fragile and delicate in their eyes. Now they were arranged together and they naturally looked down on the School of Theory. Once Sang Bei finished speaking, he couldn’t help asking, “Aren’t you angry?” Yi Jiamu wondered. “Why should I be angry?” “Because they are looking down on us!” Yi Jiamu blinked. “Still, the School of Combat is indeed better than us.” Sang Bei choked up. He wanted to refute it but he painfully discovered that Yi Jiamu was telling the truth. After too much enthusiasm, he felt suffocated and could only say, “We might lose but we can’t lose our backbone!” Yi Jiamu agreed with this and smiled sincerely. “I’m cheering for you.” Sang Bei, “...;...;” He felt that he might need some quick-acting, heart-saving pills. At the same time, he realized that this new roommate seemed to be able to talk him to death. At Sang Bei’s silence, Yi Jiamu returned to his seat. He first replied to Wu Qingji and then went to the balcony and took out a watering can. He filled it with nutrient solution and prepared to water his cactus Cici. Just then, his communicator vibrated twice. He glanced at the message that popped up. [Night God has applied to be your friend. Notes: None.] (Gu Yesheng. The Ye in his name means night.) The author has something to say: Progress: indirect kissing get√ Xu Yi saw Gu Yesheng’s social media account ID and couldn’t help complaining. “Can you change your nickname? Night God feels too chunnibyou.” Gu Yesheng replied casually, “I’m too lazy to change it.” In fact, he had wanted to enter ‘Yesheng’ at the time. As a result, there was a terminal identification problem and he registered it directly without paying attention. (God = shen in Chinese) At this time, his eyes lowered and he saw that the other person had accepted his friends application. His eyes curved with satisfaction and he dropped the communicator on the sofa. “You little cutie actually accepted you?” Xu Yi took a sip of soda. “His precautionary awareness isn’t enough! Such a chunnibyou name without a note can be accepted. Then should I try to send an application later?” Gu Yesheng glanced at him, tone not polite. “Don’t stir the muddy water.” “Yo, are you really protecting him.” Xu Yi felt this person’s attitude was a bit strange and turned to Lu Zexiu sitting next to him. “President, your ‘Shen Ze CP’ can’t be guaranteed. I don’t know how many people in the school will cry blindly because of this. Is there anything you want to say to your love rival about this matter?” Lu Zexiu took a cold breath and didn’t speak. His gaze clearly showed the words ‘you are boring’. This was the lounge of the Sublime Star school-level Abilities Association. Only members had access to it and few people came here when there was no meeting. Over time, it became a meeting place for several permanent executive members. Several members of the Sublime Star Abilities Association had their own supporters in school. There was no shortage of enthusiasts creating fan fiction and there were various CP areas in the school forum. Among them, President Lu Zexiu and Vice-president Gu Yesheng’s AA combination had the highest popularity. Although no one dared to provoke Gu Yesheng, it didn’t affect fans from secretly supporting the CP. The most interesting thing was that Gu Yesheng always closed one eye to this matter. This made the situation more subtle. At one point, some people suspected that the Shen Ze CP was real. Now there was such big gossip. Xu Yi had a side account with a high degree of followers in the campus forum and he was also involved in several gossip groups. It could be said that he could get first-hand information at any time. He came here today to have a good joke with the two people involved. Who knew that one person was more indifferent than the other and there was a lack of interest. In the end, he changed the topic to the main point. “Gu Yesheng, now your social media account is added. What are you going to do next? According to your thoughts, Gu Xiucheng is targeting that kid. You can either step in or ignore it. If you want to manage it, you will have to arrange for someone to watch him in secret. You’re much clearer about Gu Xiucheng’s means than me. Think about the fate of those who previously had a relationship with you. If you don’t make some preparations then this kid might drop out of school.” In fact, Xu Yi was speaking subtly. If Gu Xiucheng really started acting then it might be better to drop out of school. Gu Yesheng raised his long and narrow eyelashes. “If I tried to arrange someone to watch him, who should I arrange? Or do you want to go?” Next to them, Lu Zexiu closed his book and suddenly spoke. “That Gu Xiucheng, you really shouldn’t indulge him anymore.” Xu Yi was moved. “Boss, you finally expressed your position!” Gu Yesheng’s eyes drooped slightly and he leaned back lazily, his entire body falling deeply into the sofa. He turned around to find a comfortable posture, covered his face with a book and closed his eyes lazily. “Do as you like.” Xu Yi glanced at Lu Zexiu and shrugged helplessly. Gu Yesheng’s excessive special ability easily made people subconsciously fear him. People who were close to him always got into accidents and this led to other students staying away from him. Gu Yesheng actually knew who was making small moves behind his back. There was never a good ending for those who tried to provoke him. The only one Gu Yesheng was never ruthless to was Gu Xiucheng, no matter what he did. The reason was the complicated relationship within the Gu family. The Gu family’s status had always been high among the ability families with a long history. If it wasn’t for that accident, Gu Yesheng should’ve grown up with the expectations of the entire family. However, during a special mission, the Gu family was severely hurt and both of Gu Yesheng’s parents were killed. Since there was only one heir left in the fallen lineage, the strong side branches inevitably had other thoughts. As for the reason why Grandfather Gu hadn’t changed Gu Yesheng’s inheritance rights, the big reason wasn’t his feelings for his grandson. Rather, it was the ability that was unique among all the stars. Those with mental powers were already very scarce, not to mention Gu Yesheng’s absolutely aggressive ability to amplify the dark side of the opponent’s heart. He was oppressive to everyone. Still, no matter what, Gu Yesheng was just one person who he was relatively optimistic about among the Gu family’s juniors. He might be a good candidate in Grandfather Gu’s eyes but he wasn’t indispensable. If they really wanted to talk about someone, it was Gu Xiucheng. He might’ve been born from a side family but he had strong support behind him. He was more like the future heir of the family compared with Gu Yesheng, the legitimate young master. Moreover, Gu Xiucheng was a person with his own set of routines. Among his generation, he was the one most loved by Grandfather Gu. If Gu Yesheng didn’t exist then he would likely become the next family head. Gu Xiucheng was ambitious and never hid his hostility toward Gu Yesheng. Since entering Sublime Star, anyone who left a name next to Gu Yesheng would silently disappear from public view. Combined with his arrogant personality, no one dared get close to him over time. Lu Zexiu and Xu Yi were the exceptions entirely due to their prominent background. In the final analysis, Gu Xiucheng was so fearless due to Grandfather Gu’s favour. Seeing that Gu Yesheng was ready to go to sleep with the book covering him, Lu Zexiu stopped the noisy Xu Yi and dragged him out before he kept chattering. The footsteps gradually went away and the surroundings calmed down. Gu Yesheng picked up the book and threw it beside him. The sound of the book landing on the floor was particularly clear in his environment. He stared at the chandelier on the ceiling in confusion for a moment before remembering he hadn’t told the child his name. He lazily grabbed his communicator and sent a message. [Night God: I am Gu Yesheng.] It wasn’t long before a reply was sent from the other side. [Mumu: Yes, I guessed it.] He could almost imagine that beautiful and indifferent face through the screen. His lips curved up in an involuntary manner and a smile with an unclear meaning appeared. This was indeed a really interesting child. *** There was no reason from the other side to his message and Yi Jiamu didn’t care about it. He logged onto the campus network and searched for his course schedule this semester. The School of Theory was different from the other schools since it was made of ordinary students without abilities and a small number of passive students who couldn’t improve their abilities. The main focus of the course was on various theoretical studies. Just like the slogan when recruiting students, it was committed to training all-rounder talents in all fields related to abilities. There weren’t too many freshman classes. They had a few lessons every day scattered around the weekly table. The next morning was a somewhat boring theory class but everyone was obviously distracted. Most of them were still thinking about the physical education class they would be having with the School of Combat in the afternoon. Yesterday night, the newly elected class committee had mobilized the class group no less than 10 times and the theme was very clear. They must not lose face in front of those guys. Their class leader was called Wei Lanbing. As his name suggested, he was a cold and proud beta and one of the students of the School of Theory who had a passive ability. At this time, he fully utilized the functions of a class leader and directly sent a 3,000 word paper to explain the importance of the matter. His attitude was expressed but it was unknown how many people actually read it in the end. Still, they were freshmen and everyone’s motivation was strong. Yi Jiamu arrived at the training ground 10 minutes before the start of class and found that everyone had assembled, their formation quite neat. In comparison, those from the School of Combat next door were a lot less attentive. It wasn’t until the music for class rang out that people were shouting ‘reporting’ one after another. Those who arrived on time ran five laps under the instruction of the physical fitness teacher and those who came late had to run another five laps later. Then the formal content of the first physical training class began. The content was very simple. It was throwing training. The ball was a school-specific one made of a very rare metal material. It was covered with a layer of soft leather and they had to stand on both sides of the line to throw to each other. The previous day, both sides had battled on the campus forum for several rounds and they were full of dissatisfaction and anger. Yi Jiamu was casually throwing the ball back and forth with Sang Bei when he saw a student from the School of Combat come over to Wei Lanbing. “I heard that you’re quite confident. Since you think it is no problem to take a physical education class with our group, do you want to have a competition with each other?” The fire was a bit strong and other people looked over. “How do you want to compete?” Wei Lanbing still had a cold attitude and he looked like such an occasion was a bit of a drag. The student of the School of Combat sneered at this response. “It is very simple. The content of this class is throwing the ball. Why don’t we throw it at each other? As long as one person in your class can endure until the end, we will lose.” Wei Lanbing asked, “The specific rules?” The other person laughed. “I said it is just throwing the ball at each other one-on-one. If your physical strength isn’t enough then replace it with the next person.” Wei Lanbing glanced at his classmates and they responded, “Compete with them!” This type of throwing training was originally to consider the endurance of the arm stretching. It seemed that such a rule wasn’t difficult but once it was implemented, people finally realized the problem. The School of Combat basically consisted of strengthening abilities. This included the ability to strengthen the limbs, a direct strengthening using their beast shape or the special materialization of the arms. Obviously, the final distance they threw the ball far surpassed that of the School of Theory. A normal one-on-one consisted of two people of similar strength standing at specific positions and throwing at each other. However, in this case, the School of Combat students threw the ball several times beyond the position of the School of Theory. The School of Theory students had to run to pick up the ball and return to their throwing line. This consumed a lot of physical strength. After discovering the other side’s trap, the School of Theory quickly made adjustments. They just needed one person to persist until the end of the class. They simply arranged for some people to be responsible for picking up the ball so that the thrower could keep their physical strength. Even so, they had to run back and forth over such a long distance to pick up the ball. The person responsible for picking up the ball would be exhausted after a few round trips and they would be out of the game. Soon after, the throwers also started to withdraw. The people from the School of Combat started to shout. “Theory students, weren’t you very aggressive previously? How can you not do this?” Sang Bei angrily gritted his teeth but he couldn’t refute it. This made him even crazier. “Ahhh, how can they be so cocky?” Yi Jiamu leaned against the railings of the training ground while watching the fierce competition scene in the distance with blank eyes. His thoughts obviously weren’t on this situation and he only felt sleepy. Just then, someone shouted his name. “Yi Jiamu, it’s your turn to pick up the ball.” It turned out that the people who exhausted their physical strength was now nearly 90% of the class while there were still 30 minutes remaining until the class ended. Yi Jiamu awakened from his thoughts when he heard this. He glanced at the students who obviously had a low morale and rubbed his hair in a confused manner. “Oh.” The author has something to say: Look for me, I am super fierce. The School of Theory’s defeat was basically confirmed. Yi Jiamu walked toward the ball picking area but people didn’t pay much attention to him. Even Sang Bei, who pretended to ‘cheer’ enthusiastically for him, had turned his attention nervously to the throwing area of the game. As Yi Jiamu walked over, the person on the opposite side had just thrown the ball. He picked it up and threw it up before catching it again twice. It was just a momentary pause but those from the School of Combat became impatient. Someone shouted at him from a distance. “What is happening with that School of Theory student? Pick up the ball and send it back quickly! Are you using this stop method to drag out the time?” The morale of the School of Theory was low but once they heard this, they were immediately unhappy. “What are you? We didn’t say we wouldn’t pick it up! Aren’t you just relying on your abilities? What right do you have to open your mouths and look down on the School of Theory?” The other side laughed courageously. “Who is looking down on who, don’t you know?” There was an exchange of words and the fire on both sides inevitably ignited again. In the blink of an eye, some people started rolling up their sleeves. They probably would’ve started fighting if it wasn’t for the teacher. Every student who chose to come to Sublime Star’s School of Theory was full of faith in the field of abilities. As a result, the moment school started, they enjoyed the treatment of a ‘third-class citizen’. It was natural for everyone to get angry. Moreover, there were those with passive abilities who couldn’t bear it. Yi Jiamu saw the chaos in the distance and ignored it. Instead, his attention was focused on the task of picking up the ball. He lifted the metal ball in his hand, weighed his strength and calmly threw it. The metal ball flew in a beautiful arc in the air and landed near the throwing line of the School of Theory. It rolled twice and stopped at the feet of the student from the School of Theory in charge of throwing the ball. The people fighting on both sides only reacted after some time. The surroundings fell quiet. Wait, what just happened? Yi Jiamu saw his classmate still standing in a dazed manner and reminded him, “Throw it or they will say we’re dragging out the time.” The freshmen of the School of Combat were petrified in place. Then they heard such a sentence and inevitably heard a somewhat provocative taste in the dull tone. The expressions on their faces became twisted. However, looking at Yi Jiamu who was standing still, they had to accept this reality. A student of the School of Theory actually threw back the ball they threw with their ability! The physical fitness teacher to the side also looked a bit stunned and he checked the roster in his hand. The notes for this classmate called Yi Jiamu showed that he was indeed an ordinary student of the School of Theory. A normal theoretical student had physical fitness comparable to the School of Combat? This omega was a bit tough. Yi Jiamu didn’t realize that something was wrong. After the strange silence of the audience, the ball throwing task continued. He just quietly stood there and casually carried out the ball picking task. Every time the ball was thrown, he picked it up and threw it to his classmate who was throwing the ball. The opponent’s throwing distance grew further and further and Yi Jiamu also pulled the distance back. The only constant was that no matter how far away, he could always accurately throw the ball back at the feet of his classmate. The School of Combat students stared at him and it gradually became like they were looking at a ghost. Yi Jiamu faced these gazes and scratched the side of his face blankly. “?” On the tower star, he learned ancient martial arts with his grandfather since childhood. To be honest, the items they used in their training were much heavier than this small metal ball. Moreover, the freshmen of the School of Combat couldn’t fully utilize their abilities and such a distance was really nothing to him. Time passed unknowingly. By the time the music indicating the end of class slowly played, Yi Jiamu’s breathing wasn’t fluctuating too much. He slowly picked up the last ball and didn’t throw it back. He just held the ball and walked back to the class meeting point. Sang Bei almost pounced on him. “Yi Jiamu, you’re too strong!” The School of Combat had solved 90% of their classmates yet Yi Jiamu alone supported the second half of the class. Yi Jiamu quietly took a step back to avoid such excessive enthusiasm. “It’s nothing.” Victory came too suddenly. The students of the School of Theory all felt a bit dull. It was only after a long time that they recovered enough to cheer. In comparison, the School of Combat was no longer arrogant and the atmosphere was low. In this silence, one alpha walked out and came to Yi Jiamu. “Classmate, do you mind competing in one game?” Sang Bei was worshipping his stoic classmate. Once he saw that the other person came over, he couldn’t help sneering. “What? You are willing to gamble but you can’t accept a loss? Are you not convinced?” “This time, we really lost. We will take back our previous evaluation of the School of Theory and go to the forum to post an apology.” During the speech, the alpha’s gaze was always on Yi Jiamu. “This is now my personal wish. I hope to formally compare throwing distances with this classmate.” Obviously, it was a shameful thing to lose to the School of Theory. The School of Combat might have to admit it but they wanted to find a way to recover from other channels. Sang Bei directly ridiculed him. “A student of the School of Combat came to us to compare physical fitness? Do you have no shame?” Wei Langbin was originally tidying up the venue. He noticed the situation over here and also came over. “I’m the class leader. If you have anything to say then tell me.” “It is my personal request. It isn’t about the class.” The alpha lightly dismissed him, looked at Yi Jiamu and repeated solemnly, “Does this classmate mind competing against me in one last game?” The provocation was too strong. Wei Lanbing frowned and said nothing. He just stared at Yi Jiamu. Yi Jiamu was just standing there. Once the topic was shifted to him again, he didn’t hesitate. “Me? Of course I mind.” He was very busy. Why should he compete with others? The alpha clearly hadn’t expected such an answer. He was speechless for a moment before finally choking out a sentence, “You really don’t have a sense of collective honour. The School of Theory is like this. Are you trying to run away?” Yi Jiamu looked at him strangely. “Isn’t this your personal request? I am refusing using my personal position. What does it have to do with the School of Theory?” The alpha, “...;...;” Sang Bei smirked. “You heard it. We don’t need to pay attention to you!” The alpha gritted his teeth. “You aren’t willing to compete with me?” Sang Bei lost his temper at the alpha’s expression. “Hey, you’re not done yet?!” Just then, Yi Jiamu suddenly asked, “Is it possible to set a condition?” The alpha was a bit relieved and his eyes were pleased. “Yes, as long as you compete, any conditions are fine.” Yi Jiamu thought about it and smiled about him. “Then how about a month’s meal card?” The alpha wondered, “Eh?” The confused Sang Bei, “?” What type of condition was this?” Yi Jiamu declared, “Charge my meal card with a month’s worth and I will compete with you.” He saw the other person freeze for a long time and his lips lowered with disappointment. “Never mind if you don’t want to.” The alpha saw he was leaving and finally recovered. He hurriedly shouted, “Okay, a one month meal card!” The metal ball in Yi Jiamu’s hand hadn’t been taken away. He heard this alpha agree and was happy. “Then I’ll throw it first.” He moved his muscles and threw the ball vigorously into the distance. The metal ball flew in an extremely beautiful arc and flew further and further until it flew out of the end of the fourth training ground and...; disappeared. This distance was enough to kill someone in seconds. The physical fitness teacher hadn’t left yet. He roughly estimated the distance and his tone was admiring. “Based on the grading index of the senior year, this is almost at the level of a full score. This student is not bad!” “Thank you, Teacher.” Yi Jiamu smiled politely at the physical fitness teacher. Then he turned to the petrified in place alpha and reminded him, “That...; if you want to throw it then I have to trouble you to pick up the ball first.” The alpha’s original confident expression had long been completely frozen. “...;...;” At this distance, what could he throw? Anything he threw would be disgraceful. Yi Jiamu obviously didn’t mean to stay and wait for the other person. Before leaving, he didn’t forget to take out a pen and paper from his necklace storage space. He quickly wrote a series of numbers on it and handed it to the other person with a sincere attitude. “This is the ID number of my meal card. Don’t forget to recharge it when it runs out. Thank you.” “...;...;...;...;...;...;” The alpha looked at the small note in his hand and couldn’t help covering his chest to prevent himself from coughing up blood. Now he reasonably suspected that the omega’s unwillingness to compete was just a trick. This dug hole had already been waiting for him! He had actually been deceived by this innocent, angelic face! Wasn’t this person a student of the School of Theory? What type of monster was this?! The author has something to say: Invisible pretense is the deadliest. The Sublime Star campus forum had been very active since the start of the school year. That night, someone made a new post with the title: [Urgent! Asking for the identity of this college student!] There were many posts asking for new information like this every day. It was quickly ignored by everyone and gradually buried under the vast sea of posts. It was only the next morning that they found it had become hot. Some people passed by it several times on the forum homepage and eventually couldn’t help going in to take a look. The style at the beginning of the post was still normal and the top comment was a photo that was clearly taken secretly. In this photo, the omega had exquisite silver-white curls and cat-like light apricot coloured eyes. He was holding the metal ball common to the school and looked indifferent. Following it was a series of replies: [Is this a new student? This omega kid is a bit cute!] [I always thought I wouldn’t like this soft and cute style. Now I’ve found that I was wrong. It’s not that I don’t like it. I just haven’t encountered it before!] [So does anyone know which school this omega is in? Asking for information!] [I’ve confirmed it. This is the type I like. Ahhh, I want to touch.] [I just wanted to squat quietly As a result, I found that my future love rivals seem to be a bit too many?] The style of the post was normal until a newly registered account suddenly appeared as the 53rd comment. [I know. This is a new classmate of Class 5 in the SChool of Theory. During yesterday’s physical fitness class, he threw the ball and directly crushed those from the School of Combat!] [Isn’t this fake? The students of the School of Theory don’t have strengthening abilities. How can they crush others?] [I seem to have heard it as well but I didn’t expect the students of the School of Combat to be so weak? They might not have received systematic training but they can still use their ability...;] Such doubts made the senior students of the School of Combat unable to sit still. They launched a water army to state that it was absolutely impossible for the School of Combat to be crushed by the School of Theory in terms of physical fitness. Some people exaggerated the trend by saying it might be mistaken. The omega wasn’t a student of the School of Theory but the School of Elements. No matter what, everything came across with a condescending attitude. The students of the School of Theory couldn’t bear it and directly made posts insisting that the School of Combat was too much after losing. The searching for information on this good-looking person post was soon reduced to a battlefield. Later, it was unknown how but someone suddenly posted a UVA scan test sheet onto the post. According to the physical examination report, the omega freshman actually had a complete source vein space. One stone caused a thousand waves. Everyone knew that the source vein space could only be possessed by those who could effectively control the release of their own ability. Ordinary theory students and those with passive abilities couldn’t awaken it. Sublime Star’s School of theory clearly stated that it only recruited students who couldn’t train their ability. If this omega really entered the School of Theory by concealing his ability then it was no longer a matter of whether he crushed the School of Combat. The nature was undoubtedly more serious. The trend of the post changed again. The onlookers who were quietly eating melons started to express their doubts about whether the omega had applied for the School of Theory with fake information. The post ended with this reply: [Don’t argue. I have reported the situation here to the school. I believe it will be dealt with seriously. Please wait patiently for the final reply!] *** The next day, there was no class. Yi Jiamu got up late and was confused to find several messages on his communicator. They all came from the Academic Affairs Office asking him to go to the office at 12:30. He blinked his sleepy eyes and found it was almost 12 o’clock. Yi Jiamu didn’t know what happened. He just yawned, did his bed and went to the bathroom to wash up. He finished washing his face and came outside just as the door of the dormitory opened. Sang Bei entered and looked like he wanted to talk. He finished explaining the situation and Yi Jiamu finally knew about the situation on the forum. “I bet it is definitely the work of those in the School of Combat! Yesterday, they were very dissatisfied. Now that they have lost, they have started to do these small actions behind the scenes!” Sang Bei was filled with indignation. Then he saw Yi Jiamu calmly eating instant noodles and fell silent. Although there was no one else in the dormitory, he couldn’t help leaning over and lowering his voice. “Speaking of which, you really don’t have an ability?” He was present in yesterday’s physical fitness class. The way that Yi Jiamu threw the ball was too wonderful. The moment he saw the post, he started to be shaken even though he was an ally. Of course, it was just by a small amount! Yi Jiamu glanced at Sang Bei. “I didn’t violate the regulations when signing up.” Sang Bei saw that he was so calm and finally let go of his worries. “No violation, no violation is good! Once the time comes, the teachers will say the report is invalid and the School of Combat will be red-eyed!” “Yes.” Yi Jiamu answered and picked up his finished instant noodles. “I’m going to the Academic Affairs Office first.” He left the dormitory and threw the instant noodles bowl into the garbage collection area at the corner. As he walked toward the school building, he took out his communicator and called Wu Qingji’s number. His physical information was originally provided by Wu Qingji. As a resident professor of Sublime Star Abilities College, it was much more convenient if he came forward. Unfortunately, Wu Qingji seemed to be busy. The call was automatically cut off after a moment of the busy tone. Yi Jiamu thought about it and didn’t try to call again. He just directly placed the communicator in his pocket. The director of Sublime Star Abilities College’s Academic Affairs Office was called Yu Sheng and he was from the practical school of action group. He read all the files of Yi Jiamu in advance. After meeting Yi Jiamu, he clicked on a piece of missing data and asked, “Did you bring the previous hospital inspection report with you?” Yi Jiamu replied, “Professor Wu has it. I tried to contact him but I couldn’t get through.” “Wu Qingji? At this time, he should be holding a teaching and research conference in Galaxy 6.” Yu Sheng’s eyes swept over Yi Jiamu’s likable face and his never-smiling expression softened a lot. “I will leave a message for him. Before he comes, we will first do a complete GUI physical examination according to the process.” The current level of technological development meant it wasn’t difficult to falsify medical reporters. As a whole, it could only be used as a side reference. For Yi Jiamu’s situation, the Sublime Star school would use on-the-spot tests. This made the final judgment results more convincing. Therefore, Yu Sheng might want the original inspection report but it wasn’t urgent to contact Wu Qingji. Yi Jiamu nodded. “Okay, I will have to trouble you.” Yu Sheng couldn’t help his lips curving up at this well-behaved appearance. “No trouble, it is no trouble.” Yi Jiamu followed Yu Sheng to the inspection room. The two of them had just walked through the front door when someone took a photo and posted it in a gossip group. The news of the new student being taken for a medical examination spread quickly. The campus forum might have the largest traffic but no one dared to openly eat a melon involving something that Yu Sheng, the director of hell, was dealing with. Xu Yi saw this photo at random and couldn’t help shoving his terminal in front of someone’s face. “Awesome! Gu Yesheng, this kid has become a big hit so quickly. He is really the small OO you like!” Gu Yesheng was lying on the sofa but not sleeping. He had a lazy expression as he directly asked Lu Zexiu, “How is the check?” Lu Zexiu replied, “The post that revealed the medical examination report encrypted the IP source but I have determined that it is the school network that the School of Elements’ dormitory building is using.” “Sure enough, it is related to Gu Xiucheng. It seems he really wants this kid to leave the school!” Xu Yi grunted and looked at Gu Yesheng. “So what are you going to do? You’re finally interested in an omega. At this critical moment, shouldn’t you be the hero preparing to save the beauty?” “Who said that I’m interested in him?” Xu Yi smiled. “If you’re not interested then why weren’t you willing to act in the warehouse?” Gu Yesheng’s gaze fell on Xu Yi quietly before he spoke in a soft tone. “How do you know I didn’t do it?” This time, Xu Yi was completely stunned. “Eh?” “I started. I just don’t know why but my ability had no effect on him.” Xu Yi recalled the situation at the time and suddenly understood. “That’s why you touched him?” After he finished speaking, he shook with fear. “Gu Yesheng, you’re really brave! If you didn’t control it well then that student might’ve completely become a waste!” Based on the power of Gu Yesheng’s ability, maintaining a certain distance under normal circumstances was enough to cause a good psychological suggestion. This type of effect that induced the dark side would double or increase by tens of times when coming into contact with the body. Gu Yesheng apparently had no mental burden over almost turning a person into a waste. His mouth was open in a weird arc and his eyes faintly glowed. “That’s why I said that this omega is very interesting.” Xu Yi saw his expression and knew this person was ill again. He could only ask Lu Zexiu for help. “President, can you control him?” Lu Zexiu didn’t speak for a moment. Once he did, he quickly grasped the key point of their conversation. “So does this omega have an ability?” Xu Yi became aware of the serious problem once he heard this. If this reporting incident was just Gu Xiucheng acting against Gu Yesheng, it wasn’t difficult to see the moves no matter what Gu Xiucheng did behind the scenes. However, if the physical examination report was completely true and the little school student really violated the admission regulations of the School of Theory, he would be forced to drop out of school and it would be added to his resume. It was estimated that there would be no way for him to mix in with the abilities circle for the rest of his life. Gu Yesheng noticed the eyes of the other two people and raised his eyebrows lazily. “Don’t ask me. I don’t know.” Xu Yi wanted to say something when he saw Gu Yesheng roll over and suddenly jump off the sofa. He couldn’t help asking, “What are you doing?” “I’m going to the school building to accompany the old man for a few cups of tea.” Gu Yesheng impatiently rubbed his messy hair and looked unhappy. “The other day, I was teaching a trash a lesson and he directly reported me to the Academic Affairs Office. It really gave me trouble.” The author has something to say: Gu Yesheng: Who said I like him? Old Sauce (Author): Shall I give you a chance to reorganize your language? At present, the allied government’s technology in the field of abilities was very developed and detection was rapidly developing. Sublime Star Abilities College was a top ranking college for abilities. It was naturally equipped with a perfect testing system. The inspection process of these items was actually very cumbersome. Yi Jiamu went with Yu Sheng. Later, once Yu Sheng was busy, Yi Jiamu was entrusted to the teacher in the laboratory. Once everything was tested, a whole afternoon had passed. The teacher handed him a paper towel. “Student, it was hard on you. The data detection results will come out tonight and a copy will be sent to your terminal tomorrow. “Okay.” “You must be tired after such a long afternoon. Hurry back and rest.” The inspection teacher smiled and glanced at the glands on Yi Jiamu’s neck, specifically reminding him, “I will notify the relevant teachers. Don’t wander around outside. Hurry back and take a shower.” “Thank you, Teacher.” Yi Jiamu thanked him and left the testing room. At this point in time, the stellar luster had gradually dimmed, leaving only a faint afterglow. It became a background painting with intense colours in the distance. The Academic Affairs Office was located on the first floor near the staircase. From a distance, he could hear harsh reprimands coming from it. The inspection teacher already said there was no need to say goodbye to anyone else and Yi Jiamu had no plans to join in the excitement. He walked down the stairs and was about to leave. Just then, he heard the office door being kicked open from the inside. It slammed against the wall heavily and a person walked out casually with his hands in his pocket. Unexpectedly, their eyes met. The indifferent expression on Gu Yesheng’s face instantly changed to a smile of interest. “Little friend, what a coincidence.” Yi Jiamu didn’t speak and just looked past this person’s shoulder. The door of the Academic Affairs Office was opened like this but it was completely silent inside. Based on the situation just now, he didn’t know if the director had died of anger. Gu Yesheng noticed that Yi Jiamu was distracted and walked over. “Don’t worry about that old man. He is just grumpy. I heard you were checking...;” His words came to an abrupt stop. He hadn’t noticed it previously due the distance. It was only after getting close that he could feel the unique scent in the air. It was like a green plum quietly maturing in late spring. It was wet and sticky in the warm season after the first rain. Even so, the faint sour scent couldn’t be hidden. It was very light, somewhat immature but with a deep and calm sweetness. Gu Yesheng’s eyes flashed and his gaze lowered to Yi Jiamu’s neck. He opened his mouth and found that his voice was uncontrollably low and hoarse. “Your pheromones are leaking, little friend.” The inspection of various indications in the field of abilities consumed a lot of physical strength. Although the sweat around Yi Jiamu’s neck had been wiped off with a towel, there was still the wet feeling left after the release of physical strength. Therefore, the faint green plum scent was covered by this layer of sweat and lingered. This faintly discernible scent made people feel itchy. It stood to reason that there was almost no trace of this scene. Yi Jiamu hadn’t expected it to be smelt by Gu Yesheng and gave him a surprised look. “I know. I’m going back to take a bath.” Gu Yesheng saw that he was so indifferent and couldn’t help laughing. “Do you know what it means to leak your pheromones in front of an alpha?” Yi Jiamu looked at him strangely. “Do you want to mark me?” Gu Yesheng, “...;I don’t have this plan for the time being.” “Then I’m going back to take a shower.” It was such a coincidental meeting that Gu Yesheng wanted to ask about the report on the forum. Then he saw Yi Jiamu’s innocent appearance and suddenly felt there was no need to ask. Sure enough, it was useless to worry. He quietly pulled back his hand. At this time, his voice was filled with regret. “I had wanted to invite you to drink milk tea today but it seems it isn’t possible.” Yi Jiamu had been exhausted from his afternoon. Now he heard this and his eyes brightened. “It sounds good.” Gu Yesheng hadn’t expected Yi Jiamu to actually be greedy at this time. His eyes lowered slightly and he suddenly moved forward, pressing this person against the wall. His two hands were placed by Yi Jiamu’s shoulders and Gu Yesheng glanced at his neck meaningfully. He saw the glands behind the neck and couldn’t help licking his dry lips. “Little friend, you agreed so easily. Do you know what this looks like?” Yi Jiamu was close enough to have this breath sprayed on his face and was stunned. He asked without thinking, “What does it look like?” The hoarse voice contained a bit of an alpha’s possessiveness. “It is like...; you’re seducing me.” Yi Jiamu froze for a moment before reacting. He reached out for Gu Yesheng and pushed him to a safe distance. “Sorry, I always forget that you are an alpha.” Gu Yesheng’s bewitching smile faded away. He looked at this person for a moment before smiling again. This time, it seemed a bit more meaningful. “You mean that I don’t look like an alpha?” Yi Jiamu thought about it under this threatening gaze. “You look so beautiful. The average alpha doesn’t look so good.” Gu Yesheng hadn’t expected him to say such a thing and suddenly felt it was quite reasonable. “This isn’t false.” He seemed to be in a good mood as he leaned against the wall and watched Yi Jiamu. “Still, even if I look good, I am an alpha.” As an alpha, he was always an unstable factor in front of an omega leaking pheromones. What’s more, the little friend in front of him was so unaware. His figure might be slim but the slightly open collar revealed the delicate collarbone. Yi Jiamu seemed to digest the meaning of Gu Yesheng’s words and he frowned slightly. Gu Yesheng looked down at Yi Jiamu’s thin clothes. Seeing this person’s serious expression, he suddenly felt his throat tighten. He just wanted to say something when he heard faint movement behind him. The person he almost angered to death was walking out of the office. Gu Yesheng had been lectured for an afternoon and his head was aching so badly that he wanted to avoid the director. Thus, he grabbed Yi Jiamu and flashed to the triangular space under the stairs. After the whirlwind, the two people’s breaths were tangled together in one place. Their entire posture was basically together. Gu Yesheng held Yi Jiamu’s waist with one hand as he listened to Yu Sheng gradually walking away. He sighed with relief before noticing their posture. Then his thoughts took a quick detour. “Ohh, this little friend’s waist is really thin.’ He was thinking casually when he looked up and encountered a gaze. The light apricot coloured eyes were watching him quietly, bright and clear like a cat. There was clearly nothing distracting in the sight but Gu Yesheng felt the blood in his body boiling. In addition, there were the omega pheromones floating around and seemed to stir a certain alpha possessiveness in his body. Gu Yesheng was uncomfortable. Once Yu Sheng’s figure finally disappeared from view, he almost threw Yi Jiamu out of this triangular space and chuckled lightly. “If Old Yu saw me then I would be scolded again. It’s okay now. You can go back.” Yi Jiamu didn’t speak. He just watched Gu Yesheng and didn’t walk away. Gu Yesheng raised an eyebrow. He couldn’t help wanting to tease this person. “What is it? Do you need me to send you back?” Yi Jiamu finally opened his mouth. “Your pheromones seem to be leaking.” It was unknown when it happened but a sultry fragrance suddenly appeared in the midst of the omega pheromones in the air. It was soft, charming and had a unique sense of arrogance, like snow-white stamens suddenly blooming. It was a solitary narcissus alone by the water, flamboyant, charming and unrestrained. “...;...;” Gu Yesheng had been uncontrolled for a moment and released a few strands of pheromones. The moment he regained his mind, he withdrew them but he hadn’t realized there was still such a strong lingering scent around him. Before this, he had never been moved by an omega’s pheromones. In addition, it was just a light scent. Yi Jiamu saw that Gu Yesheng didn’t talk for a while and had no plans to stay. “If there is nothing else, I’ll go back to take a shower.” Gu Yesheng leaned against the wall and watched the back that was walking away for a long time. Then he made a smile with an unclear meaning and murmured roughly, “What should I do? Little friend, you seem to have successfully hooked me...;” The author has something to say: Therefore, the pheromones in this book are [evil, independent and beautiful narcissus x fresh and attractive little green plum] Exchanging pheromones scent get√ It was late at night when Wu Qingji came back from Galaxy 6. He didn’t delay and went immediately to the staff quarters. He found Yu Sheng who had a cold air around him. The light in Yu Sheng’s room was bright and he was smoking a mint cigarette while looking at the student roster. Then he looked up, saw the dusty Wu Qingji and couldn’t help ridiculing him. “Oh, this time you came back really fast.” “My child has been reported? How can I not rush back?!” Wu Qingji pulled off his coat and hung it on the hanger beside him. Then he took out a file bag and threw it over. “All the information you want is here. Take it! Hurry up and resolve this matter. I don’t want there to be any messy influences later.” Yu Sheng opened the file and smiled. “Who is your child? Why don’t I know that you have a relative with the surname Yi?” “I watched him grow up. How is he not my child?” Wu Qingji was a bit angry when he saw this person wasn’t in a rush at all. “Yu Cun, you must give me a snack this time. I’m not playing with you, understood?” Yu Sheng had come to the Sublime Star Abilities College after graduating at the age of 22. Eight years had passed and he was now 30 years old. The only thing that hadn’t changed in those years was his short height. However, since he was so serious and fierce in his daily life, most people only dared to call him ‘Yu Cun in private.’ Only Wu Qingji, who was his senior, dared to call him this name directly to his face. (Cun= unit of length/ inch/thumb/ little) Yu Sheng had rarely seen Wu Qingji like this. He took out the information and took a look, his eyes falling on the column he was most interested in. Then the cigarette in his mouth shook slightly. “Does he really have the Ability Deficit Disorder?” He had seen the case information in the file but it felt completely different seeing the detailed medical report. In normal circumstances, a person who awakened their ability would generate a corresponding energy storage system. This body system was called the ‘source space.’ It was the basis for further training and improvement of personal ability. Every time a person’s strength improved, this system would gradually improve. Those with passive abilities couldn’t train it. Since the source space in their body was difficult to improve, the space often remained in the incomplete state from when it was first created. Apart from special existences, the integrity of the source space was often used to evaluate the maturity of an abilities user. Therefore, it became one of the important indicators for many organizations to judge the strength of an ability user. In addition to ordinary theoretical students, there were students in the School of Theory with a passive ability. This was why there were such big questions when a complete source space detection map was exposed. This complete source space was top-notch even when placed against the other colleges majoring in abilities. However, it was clear that everyone was thinking from a normal perspective. They forgot an extremely special existence. Still, they couldn’t be blamed. Cases of the ‘Ability Deficient Disorder were too rare. The so-called Ability Deficit Disorder referred to being unable to awaken an ability even after generating a complete source space in the body. The patient might have a complete source space early on but for all their lives, they could only live as an ordinary person or a passive ability person who couldn’t fully use their ability. This condition had long been known but up to now, no more than 10 people had been diagnosed with it in the entire interstellar history. “Since there are complete cases that can prove the Ability Deficient Disorder, it will save time from needing to go to the hospital for a complete check up. Tomorrow, I will go to the school website and publish a statement. Then things should be fine.” In a case where the truth was so obvious, Yu Sheng was happy to give Wu Qingji some face. He spoke without hesitation and then turned to the next page in Yi Jiamu’s file. Then his gaze swept over something and suddenly stopped. “...;Wait! What is this?” Unlike the student files in the school network, the information provided by Wu Qingji was more complete. However, Yi Jiamu’s ability information wasn’t blank on this copy. A clear line of words was written Yu Sheng repeatedly looked at it to make sure he didn’t see incorrectly. He couldn’t help putting out his cigarette and the hold handing the file trembled slightly. “This ability, itk2026;” “Don’t think too much. It is exactly what you are thinking.” Wu Qingji was accustomed to Yu Sheng’s arrogant and domineering appearance and had rarely seen this expression. He couldn’t help smiling, “Isn’t it an ability that goes against the world?” Yu Sheng had been in this field for many years and it was the first time he had seen such a terrible ability. He felt like he needed to calm down. After pouring a cup of water and taking a few sips, he opened Yi Jiamu’s school file on the terminal and pointed to the words ‘theoretical student’. He gritted his teeth and asked, “You are the one who entered his student file. Why didn’t you fill in the ability column?” “Naturally, it is because his identity as a theoretical student can avoid a lot of trouble.” Wu Qingji spoke like it was obvious and it even seemed reasonable. “Mumu’s ability belongs to the passive type. It is originally within the enrollment range of the School of Theory. It isn’t too late to fill it in after comfortably passing through this semester. In any case, aren’t there people who awaken their ability in sophomore year?” Yu Sheng couldn’t help staring at him. “The school’s information must be perfect. You shouldn’t have concealed it. Doing this is causing trouble for our teaching work!” “How can this be trouble?” Wu Qingji obviously didn’t think so. “I just used the privileges of an honorary professor.” Then he looked at Yu Sheng with a smile. “In addition, I advise you not to take this matter seriously this time. I will only tell you once and don’t blame me for not reminding you. It was my teacher who entrusted me to make this student file.” Yu Sheng originally wanted to speak words of righteous indignation only to stop. “Your teacher? You mean...; Wu Qingji’s face was inscrutable. “Didn’t you meet Mumu today? Didn’t you notice his last name?” Yu Sheng didn’t speak for a long time. Then he opened his mouth. “His last name is Yi.” *** Early the next morning, Yi Jiamu received the inspection report of his physical examination. At the same time, Sublime Star’s website announced the Academic Affairs Office’s final decision on this matter. [The school’s inspection has verified that Yi Jiamu does indeed have a complete source vein space, but it also verified that he is a rare patient with the Ability Deficit Disorder. Therefore, it is hereby announced that the student hasn’t violated the admission criteria of the School of Theory.” The school’s comprehensive medical examination was also published in detail and the diagnosis report of the galaxy-level specialist hospital was attached. This was extremely authoritative. On the medical examination form, they could see a near perfect virtual modeling of the source vein space inside Yi Jiamu. It was beautiful and enviable. The School of Combat that had been shouting loudly became completely mute. In contrast, the School of Theory was enjoying a festive atmosphere. These people had vowed that there was something fishy and now their faces were swollen! However, the students of other schools on campus obviously had a different focus. Inside the School of Medicine: “Fuck, the Ability Deficit Disorder? I thought this was just written in the medical books to trick people!” “I really want to try my ability. Perhaps I can help him awaken his ability?” “What perfect research material. I want to know this student’s communication number. How can I contact him?” “I’ve suddenly found a new direction for my graduation report.” Inside the School of Elements and the School of the Mind: “Didn’t I say that your concerns were skewed? Has anyone found that the modeling of this source vein space is too beautiful?” “Yes, I also took out my physical examination report for comparison. This source is actually a theoretical one? I can’t accept it!” “I want to have such a complete source vein space. Then I won’t be at the bottom for every semester!” “Come on, don’t talk about you. Casually look around the college and see if you can find one that is more complete than this?” Yi Jiamu just heard the result. He didn’t pay any attention to the school website and didn’t know that he had become an object of discussion throughout the school. He and Sang Bei went to the cafeteria to have a comfortable meal. Then he sent a message to the alpha who lost the game to remind him that the balance of the meal card was insufficient before walking to the classroom. Yi Jiamu had a spot where he was accustomed to sitting. Usually, few people would grab it. Unexpectedly, today someone was lying down and blocking the way. He walked over and patted this person on the shoulder to discuss the position. The moment the man looked up, he saw it was Gu Yesheng who seemed to have slept from his morning class until now. Gu Yesheng’s drowsiness made his teardrop mole at the corner of his eye made him reveal a more attractive lazy charm. This type of look was fascinating but it also revealed a deep danger. Then Gu Yesheng saw the face in front of him and the dark threat dissipated a bit. “Little friend, are you looking for me?” Yi Jiamu pointed to his spot. “I have class. Can I get to that seat?” “Oh, sorry.” Gu Yesheng obviously hadn’t slept enough. His entire body was lying lazily in the chair. Once he heard the words, he slowly moved to the side. “You sit down. I’m going to sleep some more.” Yi Jiamu wanted to say something but he saw this person’s eyes closing to go to sleep. He decided to remain silent and sat down next to him. This close, he could feel the smooth breathing with faint ups and downs. Yi Jiamu glanced at the man’s back and took out a textbook from his backpack. As he turned around, he happened to meet Sang Bei’s eyes and was slightly startled. “What is it?” Sang Bei didn’t speak. His eyes just fell on Gu Yesheng’s body and shone as brightly as the twinkling stars. “This person, do you know him?” “Huh?” Sang Bei looked expectant as he spoke in a tone that only the two of them could hear. “Is he the Gu Yesheng that I know?” The doubts in Yi Jiamu’s eyes became even stronger. “He should be?” “Ahhhhhhhh!” Sang Bei screamed silently and danced with excitement for a moment. Then he took out his terminal and mysteriously went to a page on his communicator. “Mumu, do you know that I’m supporting the CP of him and the leader of our school’s Abilities Association recently!” Yi Jiamu’s eyes fell on the communicator and he saw two tall figures standing side by side in the photo on the centre of the page. Gu Yesheng’s evil face appeared in his eyes. Next to him was an unknown alpha who was cold and serious. There was a sentence below this: As long as we all support the Shen Ze CP, we will be good sisters for life! This was followed by the eye-catching section title: Shen Ze CP fan area (reversible and can’t be torn apart). Yi Jiamu, “...;...;” Why did it feel like he had accidentally found the door to a new world? The author has something to say: Night Narcissus: ?? Close the door and retract your feet. Mumu: I have already crossed through ~ 🙂